Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.060

Expense of proceedings.

The expense of such proceedings shall be paid by the town at whose request the same is incurred. The county commissioners shall each receive as compensation, an amount not exceeding the amount allowed by law for their usual services as commissioners, and, any surveyor or other assistants employed by them, a reasonable compensation to be fixed and certified by said commissioners.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.060. Prior: 1899 c 79 s 4; RRS s 9198.]